Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-14,137
Discipline of public officials or employees; effect of act.

The penalties prescribed in the Nebraska Political Accountability and Disclosure Act do not limit the power of the Legislature to discipline its own members or impeach a public official and do not limit the power of agencies or commissions to discipline officials or employees.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 137;

Laws 2005, LB 242, § 64.